Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
71-7908
Incident report, defined.

Incident report
or risk management report means a report of an incident involving injury or
potential injury to a patient as a result of patient care provided by a health
care provider, including both an individual who provides health care and an
entity that provides health care, that is created specifically for and collected
and maintained for exclusive use by a peer review committee of a health care
entity and that is within the scope of the functions of that committee.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 5.